Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1622
Maximum storage, defined.

Maximum storage means the reservoir storage capacity between the top of dam elevation, or the maximum routed elevation of the probable maximum flood if lower than the top of dam elevation, and the lowest downstream toe or outside limit elevation of the dam.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 22.